Wyoming statutes. Title 18 Counties
Article 6. County Sheriffs

Cross references. —

As to bond of county officers generally, see §

18-3-102

.

As to salary of county sheriff generally, see §

18-3-107

.

As to prima facie malfeasance in office by sheriff, see §

18-3-906

.

For provision that sheriff, etc., and prisoner shall not be subject to civil arrest when traveling through counties, see §

18-6-308

.

As to the Wyoming peace officer's training commission, see §

9-1-701

et seq.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

56 Am. Jur. 2d Municipal Corporation, Counties, etc. §§ 90, 91, 235; 70 Am. Jur. 2d Sheriffs, Police and Constables § 1 et seq.

80 C.J.S. Sheriffs and Constables § 1 et seq.

§ 18-3-601.
Office created; election.

There shall be elected in each county a county sheriff, who shall be a resident of the county in which the county sheriff serves, beginning on the first day of the term and through the last day of the term for which the county sheriff serves.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 28, art. IV, § 1; Laws 1882, ch. 45, § 7; R.S. 1887, § 1858; R.S. 1899, § 1111; C.S. 1910, § 1212; C.S. 1920, § 1459; R.S. 1931, § 30-801; Laws 1937, ch. 85, § 5; C.S. 1945, § 27-1001; W.S. 1957, § 18-172; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 2021 ch. 165, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, added ", who shall be a resident of the county in which the county sheriff serves, beginning on the first day of the term and through the last day of the term for which the county sheriff serves."

Editor's notes. —

The basic law establishing county offices and government was ch. 28, C.L. 1876.

Prior to the enactment of ch. 45, Laws 1890-91, the sheriff was the county collector, as provided by §§ 1 to 11, art. IV, ch. 28, C.L. 1876. As to the disposition of these acts, see the Table of Disposition of Acts.

Chapter 85, Laws 1937, was a general law relating to terms of county officers.

Legislative intent. —

Statute providing undersheriff becomes sheriff upon vacancy in office of sheriff is read in pari materia with sections giving county commissioners power of appointment upon vacancy, providing that every elective office becomes vacant upon death or resignation, and relating to sheriff's bonds, indicates legislative intent that undersheriff act as sheriff only while vacancy exists. State ex rel. Peterson v. Ellsworth, 59 Wyo. 288, 139 P.2d 744,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1943).

Payment for jailer's services. —

Statutory provision that for any services rendered by an officer wherein no fees are allowed by law, reasonable compensation shall be allowed, did not apply to payment for services of jailer hired by the sheriff. Board of County Comm'rs v. Johnson, 2 Wyo. 259,

1880 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1880).

Right to sue on sheriff's official bond

must be predicated upon statute requiring bond, and only person injured or entitled to benefit of security may sue thereon in his own name. Tuttle v. Short, 42 Wyo. 1, 288 P. 524,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1930).

Survival of action. —

Administrator's claim under sheriff's bond is based upon rights of intestate which survived and passed to representative for benefit of estate. Tuttle v. Short, 42 Wyo. 1, 288 P. 524,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1930).

Cause of action for wrongful death, while under arrest and riding in sheriff's automobile, did not survive sheriff's death, hence was not maintainable against sheriff's administrator or surety upon sheriff's official bond. Tuttle v. Short, 42 Wyo. 1, 288 P. 524,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1930).

Tort action against sheriff's estate. —

In action against sheriff's administrator and surety on sheriff's bond which was in form joint and several, under which the state was obligee, where it appeared that plaintiff in custody of sheriff was riding with him and his deputy in automobile, and that plaintiff was injured when automobile operated by deputy plunged over cliff, plaintiff as person injured was entitled to bring action in his own name. Stephens v. Short, 41 Wyo. 324, 285 P. 797,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1930).

Transportation of prisoners. —

Sheriff owes duty to transport prisoner with reasonable care for latter's safety, separate and apart from promise contained in official bond. Tuttle v. Short, 42 Wyo. 1, 288 P. 524,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1930).

Stated

in

Pfister v. Niobrara County, 557 P.2d 735,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 233

(Wyo. 1976).

Cited

in

Taxpayers' League v. McPherson, 49 Wyo. 251, 54 P.2d 897,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 48

, 106 A.L.R. 767 (1936).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Civil liability, under federal civil rights statute (42 U.S.C. § 1983) of state officers who coerce or attempt to coerce confessions or pleas of guilty, 55 ALR2d 512.

Personal liability of sheriff, or his bond, for negligently causing personal injury or death, 60 ALR2d 873.

Power to appoint sheriff for term commencing at or after expiration of term of appointing officer or body, 75 ALR2d 1277.

Personal liability of policeman, sheriff, or similar peace officer or his bond, for injury suffered as a result of failure to enforce law or arrest law breaker, 41 ALR3d 700.

Liability for false arrest or imprisonment under warrant as affected by mistake as to identity of person arrested, 39 ALR4th 705.

§ 18-3-602.
Qualifications, appointment, duties and salary of undersheriff; deputies, reserve deputies, clerks, stenographers and assistants; appointment of deputies for special acts; appointment of deputies by county commissioners.

Each county sheriff may appoint an undersheriff who shall be a bona fide resident of the county, qualify as required by law for deputy sheriff and serve as sheriff in case of death, resignation or other disability of the sheriff until the board of county commissioners fill the vacancy. The person appointed shall qualify in accordance with law and may receive an annual salary fixed by the board of county commissioners at not less than twenty-five percent (25%) of the annual salary of the sheriff in their respective counties.

With the consent of the board of county commissioners each county sheriff may appoint one (1) or more full-time deputies who may receive an annual salary fixed by the board of county commissioners at not less than twenty percent (20%) of the sheriff’s salary. The sheriff may also appoint other assistants as necessary to properly administer the affairs of the office.

In addition to the authority granted under W.S.

7-2-106

, each county sheriff may also appoint special deputies to perform particular acts, which shall be specified in each appointment and for whose official acts he is responsible. Such appointments are not required to be filed or revoked as in the case of regular deputies. No county assessor shall be appointed deputy sheriff.

In addition to the authority granted under W.S.

7-2-106

, each county sheriff may employ temporary deputies and assistants authorized by the board of county commissioners. The compensation of these deputies and assistants shall be fixed by the board of county commissioners.

In addition to the authority granted under W.S.

7-2-106

, each board of county commissioners, when extraordinary or unusual danger to life or property is in progress or is threatened and the regular county officers cannot maintain proper order, may appoint special deputy sheriffs only for the duration of the extraordinary or unusual danger. Each special deputy sheriff shall be:

An elector of the county and shall take an oath to faithfully discharge the duties of the office;

Subject to the orders of the county sheriff who is responsible for their acts, unless otherwise ordered by the board of county commissioners; and

Compensated at a rate established by the board of county commissioners.

Each county sheriff may appoint reserve deputy sheriffs to assist the sheriff as necessary to properly administer the affairs of the office. A reserve deputy sheriff acting less than full-time in the service of the county shall have peace officer authority, provided the reserve deputy sheriff has qualified pursuant to W.S.

9-1-701

through

9-1-707

. The compensation for deputy reserve sheriffs shall be fixed by the board of county commissioners.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 28, art. IV, §§ 2, 3; Laws 1886, ch. 43, §§ 1 to 4; R.S. 1887, §§ 1859, 1860, 1863 to 1866; R.S. 1899, §§ 1117, 1118, 1121 to 1124; C.S. 1910, §§ 1218, 1219, 1222 to 1224; C.S. 1920, §§ 1465, 1466, 1469 to 1472; Laws 1925, ch. 110, § 1; R.S. 1931, §§ 30-807, 30-808, 30-811 to 30-814; Laws 1943, ch. 18, § 1; 1945, ch. 161, § 1; C.S. 1945, §§ 27-1002, 27-1003, 27-1016 to 27-1019; Laws 1949, ch. 116, § 1; 1953, ch. 159, § 1; 1957, ch. 191, § 2; W.S. 1957, §§ 18-173, 18-174, 18-187 to 18-190; Laws 1961, ch. 129, § 1; 1969, ch. 124, § 1; 1976, ch. 11, § 1; 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 1981, ch. 112, § 1; 2004, ch. 45, § 1; 2005, ch. 170, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to appointment of deputies and assistants generally, see §

18-3-107

.

The 2004 amendment,

in (c) through (e), added “In addition to the authority granted under W.S.

7-2-106

” at the beginning.

Laws 2004, ch. 45, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2004.

The 2005 amendment

added (f).

Laws 2005, ch. 170, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2005.

Legislative intent. —

Statute providing undersheriff becomes sheriff upon vacancy in office of sheriff is read in pari materia with sections giving county commissioners power of appointment upon vacancy, providing that every elective office becomes vacant upon death or resignation, and relating to sheriff's bonds, indicating legislative intent that undersheriff act as sheriff only while vacancy exists. State ex rel. Peterson v. Ellsworth, 59 Wyo. 288, 139 P.2d 744,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1943).

Modified construction. —

Even if this section could be construed as actually making undersheriff the sheriff, in case of death or resignation of incumbent, § 27-116, W.C.S. 1945, clearly modified it by making no exception to power to fill vacancy in any county office. State ex rel. Peterson v. Ellsworth, 59 Wyo. 288, 139 P.2d 744,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1943).

The 1943 amendment

to this section definitely decided that undersheriff should serve only until vacancy should be filled and recognized and intended to make certain law as it had been for at least half a century. State ex rel. Peterson v. Ellsworth, 59 Wyo. 288, 139 P.2d 744,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1943).

Legislative acquiescence. —

Where attorney general construed that this section meant that undersheriff could hold office only until new sheriff was appointed pursuant to § 27-116, W.C.S. 1945, failure of legislature to amend statute for 17 years thereafter indicates legislative acquiescence in such construction. State ex rel. Peterson v. Ellsworth, 59 Wyo. 288, 139 P.2d 744,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1943).

Powers and duties. —

An undersheriff is in effect a deputy sheriff, so that a sale and deed executed by such undersheriff is valid. Delfelder v. Teton Land & Inv. Co., 46 Wyo. 142, 24 P.2d 702,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 46 Wyo. 142, 26 P.2d 153,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 1933).

Purpose. —

Since at common law authority of deputy sheriff ipso facto terminated when sheriff went out of office, statute, to remedy difficulty, provides duties shall in such cases be discharged by deputy or undersheriff only until vacancy is filled by appointment or election. State ex rel. Peterson v. Ellsworth, 59 Wyo. 288, 139 P.2d 744,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1943).

The Fair Employment Practices Act has no application to the appointment of a deputy sheriff.

Pfister v. Niobrara County, 557 P.2d 735,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 233

(Wyo. 1976).

A deputy sheriff is an officer, not an employee;

he is appointed, not hired. Pfister v. Niobrara County, 557 P.2d 735,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 233

(Wyo. 1976).

A deputy sheriff is not an employee of either the sheriff or the board of county commissioners; he is appointed by the sheriff to fill a county office specifically authorized by law. Pfister v. Niobrara County, 557 P.2d 735,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 233

(Wyo. 1976).

Discharge of appointees for political association. —

Where appointees of a sheriff who have been discharged by his successor claim that their first amendment right of association has been violated, the defendant must bear the burden of proof on the issue whether party affiliation (or particular political association and support) was an appropriate requirement for the effective performance of the public office involved, but the burden on the appointees is to prove that their discharge or threat of discharge was for the reason that they were affiliated with the ex-sheriff. Dickeson v. Quarberg, 844 F.2d 1435, 1988 U.S. App. LEXIS 5515 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1988).

No protected property interest. —

Because board of county commissioners cannot control sheriff's appointments under his independent office, such appointments create no constitutionally protected property interest. Bachmeier v. Hoffman, 1 P.3d 1236,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 78

(Wyo. 2000).

Appointed jailer and assistant, discharged by sheriff's successor, did not have property interest

within the meaning of the fourteenth amendment with respect to their positions, since the sheriff's representations and any understandings he had with appointees were necessarily confined to his term of office under the Wyoming elective system. Dickeson v. Quarberg, 844 F.2d 1435, 1988 U.S. App. LEXIS 5515 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1988).

The board of county commissioners is not empowered to control the sheriff's appointments under his independent office created by the Wyoming statutes with respect to either the appointment of one plaintiff as a jailer or another plaintiff as an assistant, with her clerical, process service and other functions. Hence, no property interest is created by the personnel policies and practices of the board of county commissioners for purposes of the fourteenth amendment by reason of such appointments. Dickeson v. Quarberg, 844 F.2d 1435, 1988 U.S. App. LEXIS 5515 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1988).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction, and application of regulation regarding outside employment of governmental employees or officers, 88 ALR2d 1235.

Validity, construction, and application of regulations regarding outside employment of governmental employees or officers, 62 ALR5th 671.

§ 18-3-603.
Duty as custodian of jail and prisoners; requirements for boarding prisoners; quarters or rental allowance to be furnished by county.

Each sheriff has charge of the jail and the prisoners therein confined in his county. The prisoners shall be kept by the sheriff or by a deputy or detention officer appointed for that purpose, and for whose acts he and his sureties are liable. The sheriff shall provide three (3) nutritionally balanced meals each day for each prisoner. Each sheriff shall make a monthly accounting to the board of county commissioners to show that the expenditures have actually been made.

The sheriff shall not be charged rent for any building owned or controlled by the county and occupied by him as a residence. If a residence is not furnished the sheriff by the county, the sheriff may be allowed an amount established annually by the board of county commissioners on or before July 1 of each calendar year. The amount shall be paid monthly and shall not exceed the prevailing rate of the municipality in which the sheriff resides.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 28, art. IV, § 4; R.S. 1887, § 1867; Laws 1895, ch. 76, § 10; R.S. 1899, § 1129; Laws 1903, ch. 56, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 1230; Laws 1917, ch. 12, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 1477; R.S. 1931, § 30-819; Laws 1945, ch. 5, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 27-1004; Laws 1957, ch. 176, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 18-175; Laws 1973, ch. 18, § 1; 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 1981, ch. 82, § 1; 1995, ch. 122, § 2.

Discharge of appointees for political association. —

Where appointees of a sheriff who have been discharged by his successor claim that their first amendment right of association has been violated, the defendant must bear the burden of proof on the issue whether party affiliation (or particular political association and support) was an appropriate requirement for the effective performance of the public office involved, but the burden on the appointees is to prove that their discharge or threat of discharge was for the reason that they were affiliated with the ex-sheriff. Dickeson v. Quarberg, 844 F.2d 1435, 1988 U.S. App. LEXIS 5515 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1988).

Appointed jailer and assistant, discharged by sheriff's successor, did not have property interest

within the meaning of the fourteenth amendment with respect to their positions, since the sheriff's representations and any understandings he had with appointees were necessarily confined to his term of office under the Wyoming elective system. Dickeson v. Quarberg, 844 F.2d 1435, 1988 U.S. App. LEXIS 5515 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1988).

The board of county commissioners is not empowered to control the sheriff's appointments under his independent office created by the Wyoming statutes with respect to either the appointment of one plaintiff as a jailer or another plaintiff as an assistant, with her clerical, process service and other functions. Hence, no property interest is created by the personnel policies and practices of the board of county commissioners for purposes of the fourteenth amendment by reason of such appointments. Dickeson v. Quarberg, 844 F.2d 1435, 1988 U.S. App. LEXIS 5515 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1988).

Applied

in

Boyer-Gladden v. Hill, 2010 WY 12, 224 P.3d 21,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Feb. 9, 2010).

Cited

in

Park County Bd. of County Comm'rs v. Hodge, 792 P.2d 1390,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(Wyo. 1990).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Civil liability of sheriff or other officer charged with keeping jail or prison for act of deputy causing death or injury of prisoner, 14 ALR2d 353, 41 ALR3d 1021.

§ 18-3-604.
Service of process; attendance upon courts.

The county sheriff or his deputy shall serve and execute according to law all processes, writs, precepts and orders issued by any court of record in his county or other lawful authority in all criminal and civil cases and he shall attend all courts of record in his county.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 28, art. IV, § 5; R.S. 1887, § 1868; R.S. 1899, § 1125; C.S. 1910, § 1226; C.S. 1920, § 1473; R.S. 1931, § 30-815; C.S. 1945, § 27-1005; W.S. 1957, § 18-176; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

Cited

in

First Wyo. Bank v. Trans Mt. Sales & Leasing, Inc., 602 P.2d 1219,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 484

(Wyo. 1979).

§ 18-3-605.
Service of process on sheriff; appearing as attorney prohibited.

Every paper required by law to be served on the county sheriff may be served on him in person or left at his office during business hours. No sheriff or deputy shall appear or advise as attorney or counselor in any case in any court.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 28, art. IV, § 7; R.S. 1887, § 1870; R.S. 1899, § 1127; C.S. 1910, § 1228; C.S. 1920, § 1475; R.S. 1931, § 30-817; C.S. 1945, § 27-1007; W.S. 1957, § 18-177; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to process generally, see §§

1-6-101

to

1-6-301

.

§ 18-3-606.
Duty to preserve peace.

Each county sheriff and deputy shall preserve the peace in the respective counties and suppress all affrays, riots, unlawful assemblies and insurrections. Each sheriff or deputy sheriff may call upon any person to assist in performing these duties or for the service of process in civil and criminal cases or for the apprehension or securing of any person for felony or breach of peace.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 28, art. IV, § 6; R.S. 1887, § 1869; R.S. 1889, § 1126; C.S. 1910, § 1227; C.S. 1920, § 1474; R.S. 1931, § 30-816; C.S. 1945, § 27-1006; W.S. 1957, § 18-178; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 1985, ch. 212, § 3.

Warrantless arrest. —

Arrest of a party for mere drunkenness by a sheriff without warrant is unlawful. State v. Munger, 43 Wyo. 404, 4 P.2d 1094,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1931).

Applied

in

Pfister v. Niobrara County, 557 P.2d 735,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 233

(Wyo. 1976); Hoblyn v. Johnson, 2002 WY 152, 55 P.3d 1219,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 2002).

§ 18-3-607.
Cash book to be kept by sheriff as ex officio county collector; entries to be made; inspection; receipts; penalties.

Every county sheriff as ex officio county collector shall have and keep in his office a cash book in which shall be entered all monies paid him by virtue of his office, together with the date of payment, the name of the person paying the same and the purpose for which it was paid. Each cash book shall at all reasonable hours of the day be open to the inspection and examination of all persons desiring to examine it.

Upon receiving any money the sheriff shall issue a receipt to the person paying the same, entering on the receipt the same information required to be entered in the cash book.

Any county sheriff or deputy who fails to perform the duties specified in subsections (a) and (b) of this section or who fails to perform any other duties required by law is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be fined not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500.00). In addition the court may adjudge that the sheriff be removed from office.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 28, art. IV, §§ 8, 9, 11; R.S. 1887, §§ 1836, 1837, 1839; R.S. 1899, §§ 1097, 1098, 1100; C.S. 1910, §§ 1196, 1197, 1199; Laws 1919, ch. 27, § 1; C.S. 1920, §§ 1442, 1443, 1445; R.S. 1931, §§ 30-1116, 30-1117, 30-1119; C.S. 1945, §§ 27-1008, 27-1009, 27-1011; W.S. 1957, §§ 18-179 to 18-181; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

All sections were originally enacted as §§ 8, 9 and 11, art. IV, ch. 28, of C.L. 1876. Article IV of this act related solely to the sheriff. The county treasurer was made the collector of taxes by § 3, ch. 45, Laws 1890-91.

In general. —

This section requires to be entered in the cash book, among other things, every sum of money paid the collector by virtue of his office, the date of the payment, the name of the person paying the same, and the account upon which the same was paid. Lobban v. State, 9 Wyo. 377, 64 P. 82,

1901 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1901).

Tax receipt. —

Where taxes have been fully liquidated, the tax receipt should be one in full, not merely a statement of the amount paid. Lobban v. State, 9 Wyo. 377, 64 P. 82,

1901 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1901).

Cited

in

Roberts v. Board of County Comm'rs, 8 Wyo. 177, 56 P. 915,

1899 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(1899).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Power of sheriff to remit, release or compromise taxes, 28 ALR2d 1425.

§ 18-3-608.
Fees generally.

For the serving of process according to the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure, each county sheriff shall receive from the party requesting service a single fee, to be determined and set by the board of county commissioners after a public hearing, paid in advance to be credited to the county general fund, not to exceed fifty dollars ($50.00) for the first three (3) attempts at service at a different time and date for each attempt. Thereafter a fee not to exceed ten dollars ($10.00) may be charged for each succeeding attempt. The court may waive the fees upon an adequate showing of indigency. Any fees waived may, pursuant to court order, be assessed and collected against any judgment rendered. Each county sheriff shall receive from the party for whom service is rendered in civil cases the following fees which shall be transmitted to the county treasurer to be credited to the county general fund and which shall be paid in advance if demanded by the sheriff from the party for whom the service is rendered:

Deleted by Laws 1993, ch. 158, § 1.

through (viii) Repealed by Laws 1993, ch. 158, § 2.

Commission on money collected on execution or other final process, where the same is collected without sale of property:

For the first five hundred dollars ($500.00), two percent (2%);

For the second five hundred dollars ($500.00), one percent (1%);

For all over one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), one-half of one percent (0.5%).

Where collection is made upon a sale of the property, the commissions allowed are as follows:

On the first five hundred dollars ($500.00), four percent (4%);

On the second five hundred dollars ($500.00), two percent (2%);

On all over one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), one percent (1%).

For advertising property for sale, one dollar and fifty cents ($1.50).

and (xiii) Repealed by Laws 1993, ch. 158, § 2.

When in the execution of his duties, it is necessary for the county sheriff to take, store, keep, maintain or subsist any property he is entitled to receive a reasonable allowance to cover all actual and necessary expenses of doing so. The allowance shall be fixed by the proper court upon affidavit made by the sheriff or his deputy or undersheriff, detailing all items of expense, and that the expenses were actually and necessarily incurred. The court before allowing the claim may require additional evidence to sustain the claim. The county sheriff before incurring any expense may require the party for whose benefit the expense is to be incurred to deposit a sum sufficient to meet the same. The allowance shall accrue to the sheriff, and he shall not be chargeable therewith.

Repealed by Laws 1989, ch. 32, § 2.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 76, §§ 11 to 13; R.S. 1899, §§ 1113 to 1115; C.S. 1910, §§ 1214 to 1216; C.S. 1920, §§ 1461 to 1463; Laws 1927, ch. 59, § 1; R.S. 1931, §§ 30-803 to 30-805; Laws 1935, ch. 41, § 2; C.S. 1945, §§ 27-1012 to 27-1014; W.S. 1957, §§ 18-182 to 18-184; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 1983, ch. 103, § 1; 1989, ch. 32, § 2, ch. 76, § 1; 1993, ch. 158, §§ 1, 2; 1994, ch. 61, § 1; 2006, ch. 48, § 1; 2011, ch. 132, § 1; 2012, ch. 39, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to payment of expenses for return of accused to this state, see §

7-3-224

.

As to fees of sheriff in connection with sale of lands to enforce liens relative to water rights under Carey Act, see §

36-7-508

.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, substituted “thirty-five dollars ($35.00)” for “twenty dollars ($20.00)” in (a).

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, substituted “fifty dollars ($50.00)” for “thirty-five dollars ($35.00),” and “ten dollars ($10.00)” for “five dollars ($5.00).”

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, deleted “biannually” after “determined and set” in (a).

In general. —

A sheriff may demand his fees in advance. Beeman & Cashin Mercantile Co. v. Sorenson, 15 Wyo. 450, 89 P. 745,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 15 Wyo. 450, 89 P. 1135,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1907).

Construction. —

Provision that in addition to salary a sheriff may receive fees for services rendered in civil cases should be construed as including legal proceedings for protection or enforcement of private rights and redress of private wrongs. Messenger v. Board of Comm'rs, 19 Wyo. 309, 117 P. 126,

1911 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1911).

Inspection fees. —

Sheriff was not entitled to retain an inspection fee on horses within constitutional provision which allowed sheriff to receive as compensation in addition to his salary fees for services rendered to a party in civil cases. Messenger v. Board of Comm'rs, 19 Wyo. 309, 117 P. 126,

1911 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1911).

Under statute providing for an inspection of horses about to be transported or driven out of the state, fixing an inspection fee and making the sheriff the inspecting officer, the acts of the sheriff in making the inspection were not services rendered in civil cases within the meaning of art. 14, § 2, Wyo. Const., and the law, providing for the inspection, could provide that the fees should be paid into the general fund of the county. Messenger v. Board of Comm'rs, 19 Wyo. 309, 117 P. 126,

1911 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1911).

Vacation of order. —

Where order is vacated at a succeeding term, a new or amended affidavit might be filed, and the court had jurisdiction to hear and determine the same. Beeman & Cashin Mercantile Co. v. Sorenson, 15 Wyo. 450, 89 P. 745,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 15 Wyo. 450, 89 P. 1135,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1907).

Proof of ownership in attached property. —

It being permissible under statute to have the expense allowed and liability of the proper parties enforced for keeping of attached property in suit wherein attachment was levied, the same objections were open to the party attempted to be charged as though a separate action had been brought, and defendant was entitled upon motion, the purpose of which was to tax the costs of keeping attached property against him, to show that he was not the owner thereof. Beeman & Cashin Mercantile Co. v. Sorenson, 15 Wyo. 450, 89 P. 745,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 15 Wyo. 450, 89 P. 1135,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1907).

Expenses for attached property. —

After defendant paid judgment rendered against him, together with costs, plaintiff, at same term filed affidavit of deputy sheriff, showing expense in caring for attached property, and judge indorsed thereon “order allowed,” with no entry of formal order. The purpose of asking the order was to place liability for sheriff's expenses on defendant, and the order of allowance, (assuming judge's indorsement on the affidavit had effect of an order of allowance), having been granted without notice to defendant, could be vacated upon defendant's motion having been filed at the term the order was granted, and court had jurisdiction to determine same at the following term. Beeman & Cashin Mercantile Co. v. Sorenson, 15 Wyo. 450, 89 P. 745,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 15 Wyo. 450, 89 P. 1135,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1907).

Execution sale. —

Where judgment creditor bought property at execution sale for less than judgment debt, purchase price being credited upon the judgment, sheriff was entitled to commission allowed by this section on money collected on execution. Lyman v. Thorn, 24 Wyo. 326, 157 P. 887,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1916).

Commission at execution sale. —

A sheriff is entitled to commission at an execution sale where the judgment creditor purchases the property for less than the judgment debt, although no money actually changes hands and purchase price was merely credited upon the judgment and execution. Lyman v. Thorn, 24 Wyo. 326, 157 P. 887,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1916).

Cited

in

Taxpayers' League v. McPherson, 49 Wyo. 251, 54 P.2d 897,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 48

, 106 A.L.R. 767 (1936).

§ 18-3-609.
Other duties.

Each county sheriff shall:

Pay and account for all monies which come into his office, as provided by law;

Deliver to his successor in office or other person authorized by law to receive them all monies, books, papers and other property belonging to his office;

Be the official responsible for coordination of all search and rescue operations within his jurisdiction;

Perform all other duties required of him by law.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 28, art. IV, §§ 1, 10; Laws 1882, ch. 45, § 7; R.S. 1887, §§ 1858, 1871; R.S. 1899, §§ 1111, 1128; C.S. 1910, §§ 1212, 1229; C.S. 1920, §§ 1444, 1459; R.S. 1931, §§ 30-801, 30-808, 30-1118; Laws 1937, ch. 85, § 5; C.S. 1945, §§ 27-1001, 27-1010; W.S. 1957, §§ 18-172, 18-192; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 1991, ch. 210, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 18-3-610.
Custodian of jail when sheriff imprisoned.

When the sheriff is committed to the jail of his county, the board of county commissioners shall appoint a special deputy sheriff to act as custodian thereof during the time the sheriff remains a prisoner.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 28, art. VI, § 2; R.S. 1887, § 1877; R.S. 1899, § 1171; C.S. 1910, § 1277; C.S. 1920, § 1529; R.S. 1931, § 30-702; C.S. 1945, § 27-902; W.S. 1957, § 7-78; W.S. 1977, §

7-4-102

; Laws 1985, ch. 212, § 2.

§ 18-3-611.
Sheriff's office employees; removal from office; hearings.

This section applies to sworn nonprobationary, full-time deputies of a sheriff’s department which employs at least twenty (20) sworn, full-time deputies. Except as provided by subsection (d) of this section, this section does not apply to any member of the executive staff. As used in this subsection, “member of the executive staff” means a deputy whose primary duties consist of the management of the department or a subdivision thereof, who regularly exercises discretionary powers as they relate to the employment status of employees and who is directly supervised by the sheriff.

A deputy sheriff shall not be discharged from employment, reduced in rank or suspended without pay except for cause and after notice and opportunity for a hearing. The hearing and any appeal shall be conducted in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. The hearing shall be closed unless both the sheriff and the deputy involved agree otherwise.

A deputy sheriff accused of a matter for which the sheriff may discharge him may be suspended with pay for a reasonable length of time necessary to investigate and take final action on the matter, provided the deputy shall not be discharged in any final action without the opportunity for a hearing.

A sheriff may in his discretion reduce in rank a member of the executive staff but shall not terminate him without cause.

This section does not prohibit or restrict discharges from employment, in order of lowest ranking deputies first, for purposes of reorganization of the sheriff’s office or for the reason of lack of funds.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 220, § 1; 2010, ch. 82, § 1.

The 2010 amendment,

made stylistic change in (a).

Laws 2010, ch. 82, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2010.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Meaning of “cause.” —

“Cause,” to which this section refers when it states that a deputy sheriff may be terminated only “for cause,” necessarily means a cause or justification which bears a reasonable relationship to the deputy sheriff's ability and fitness to perform and discharge the duties of his or her position. Lucero v. Mathews, 901 P.2d 1115,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 156

(Wyo. 1995), reh'g denied,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 181

(Wyo. Sept. 26, 1995).

Procedure. —

A claim for damages against the state for breach of the employment relationship based either in contract or tort must proceed, if at all, in accordance with the Governmental Claims Act, §

1-39-101

et seq. Allen v. Lucero, 925 P.2d 228,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 138

(Wyo. 1996), reh'g denied,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 156

(Wyo. Oct. 29, 1996), overruled in part, Brown v. City of Casper, 2011 WY 35, 248 P.3d 1136,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 2011).

Due process right. —

Section

18-3-611

creates a property right in the position of a full-time deputy sheriff by requiring that any termination of employment be for cause and after notice and opportunity for a hearing. In addition to the statutory requirements for notice and opportunity to be heard, there is then a federal constitutional right to due process of law that demands notice of the cause for termination and a hearing on the existence of the cause prior to terminating employment of a full-time deputy sheriff. Lucero v. Mathews, 901 P.2d 1115,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 156

(Wyo. 1995), reh'g denied,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 181

(Wyo. Sept. 26, 1995).

This section imposed a substantive limitation on sheriff's discretion to reduce rank of a deputy sheriff, and thus deputy sheriff had a protected property interest in continued employment at his rank of lieutenant. Greene v. Barrett, 174 F.3d 1136, 1999 U.S. App. LEXIS 7516 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1999).

Deputy sheriff failed to show that his property right in continued employment at his rank was clearly established at time sheriff reduced his rank, and therefore sheriff was entitled to qualified immunity from deputy sheriff's civil rights suit. Greene v. Barrett, 174 F.3d 1136, 1999 U.S. App. LEXIS 7516 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1999).

Political patronage not cause for termination. —

Under §

18-3-611

, political patronage and other expressions of the freedom of association and party affiliation are not cause or justification for which a deputy sheriff may be terminated. Lucero v. Mathews, 901 P.2d 1115,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 156

(Wyo. 1995), reh'g denied,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 181

(Wyo. Sept. 26, 1995).

Discharge upheld. —

Deputy sheriff failed to refute evidence of his absenteeism and dishonesty, and his discharge was therefore upheld. Fisch v. Allsop, 4 P.3d 204,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 94

(Wyo. 2000).

Applied

in

Laramie County Sheriff's Dep't v. Cook, 2012 WY 47, 272 P.3d 966,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(Mar. 28, 2012).

Stated

in

Mondt v. Cheyenne Police Dep't, 924 P.2d 70,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 127

(Wyo. 1996).

Cited

in

Metz v. Laramie County Sch. Dist. No. 1, 2007 WY 166, 173 P.3d 334,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Oct. 23, 2007).